Utah statutes.
78B-5-802.   Tender -- Offer in writing sufficient -- Objection -- Must be specific or waived.

(1)  An offer in writing to pay a particular sum of money or to deliver a written instrument or specific personal property is, if not accepted, equivalent to the actual production and tender of the money, instrument, or property.

(2)  The person to whom a tender is made shall, at the time, specify any objection to the money, instrument, or property, or it is considered waived.

(3)  If the objection is to the amount of money, the terms of the instrument or the amount or kind of property, the person shall specify the amounts, terms, or kind which is required, or be precluded from objection afterwards.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

